New York, session 2025-2026, S6217.
do enact as follows: 1 § 1. Subdivision 5 of section 13-a of the workers' compensation law, 2 as amended by section 8 of part CC of chapter 55 of the laws of 2019, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (5) No claim for specialist consultations, surgical operations, 5 physiotherapeutic or occupational therapy procedures, x-ray examinations 6 or special diagnostic laboratory tests costing more than one thousand 7 five hundred dollars shall be valid and enforceable, as against such 8 employer, unless such special services shall have been authorized by the 9 employer or by the board, or unless such authorization has been unrea- 10 sonably withheld, or withheld for a period of more than thirty calendar 11 days from receipt of a request for authorization, or unless such special 12 services are required in an emergency, provided, however, that the basis 13 for a denial of such authorization by the employer must be based on a 14 conflicting second opinion rendered by a physician authorized by the 15 board. The board, with the approval of the superintendent of financial 16 services, shall issue and maintain a list of pre-authorized procedures 17 under this section. Such list of pre-authorized procedures shall be 18 issued and maintained solely for the purpose of expediting authorization 19 of treatment of injured workers. Such list of pre-authorized procedures 20 shall not prohibit varied treatment [when the treating provider demon- 21 strates the appropriateness and medical necessity of such], nor shall 22 the list be used as a basis to deny treatment not contained therein. 23 Requests for varied treatment need only comply with the provisions of 24 this subdivision. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04384-01-5 S. 6217 2 1 § 2. Subdivision 7 of section 13-a of the workers' compensation law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 3 (e) Any special diagnostic tests, x-ray examinations, magnetic reso- 4 nance imaging or other radiological examinations or tests costing more 5 than one thousand five hundred dollars performed by a provider who is 6 not a member of the carrier's, self-insured's or state insurance fund's 7 diagnostic network or networks, shall be entitled to payment at the 8 negotiated network rate. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.